Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.110

Plenary authority of director—Flexibility in use of remedies.

(1) If the director determines to act under authority of this chapter, the sequence of his or her acts and proceedings shall be as set forth in this chapter.

(2) However, the director may, in the exercise of broad administrative discretion, proceed in lieu of this chapter and pursuant to other authority including, without limitation, notice and adjudication under chapter 30B.10 RCW or by means of seeking a direct judicial remedy in superior court.

[ 2019 c 389 s 90.]